Utah statutes.
75-2-805.   Reformation to correct mistakes.
The court may reform the terms of a governing instrument, even if unambiguous,
to conform the terms to the transferor's intention if it is proved by clear
and convincing evidence that the transferor's intent and the terms of the
governing instrument were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in
expression or inducement.
